Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 2 INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
25.5-10-220. Right to medical care and treatment.

Each person receiving services must have access to appropriate dental and medical care and treatment for any physical ailments and for the prevention of any illness or disability.

No medication for which a prescription is required shall be administered without the written order of a physician. A physician shall conduct a review of all prescriptions and other orders for medications in order to determine the appropriateness of the person's medication regimen annually, or more often, if required by law.

All service agencies which administer medication shall require that notation of the medication of a person receiving services be kept in the person's medical records. All medications must be administered pursuant to part 3 of article 1.5 of title 25, C.R.S.

Persons receiving services must have a right to be free from unnecessary or excessive medication. The service agency's records must state the effects of psychoactive medication if administered to the person receiving services. When dosages of such are changed or other psychoactive medications are prescribed, a notation must be made in such person's record concerning the effect of the new medication or new dosages and the behavior changes, if any, which occur.

Medication must not be used for the convenience of the staff, for punishment, as a substitute for a treatment program, or in quantities that interfere with the treatment program of the person receiving services.

Only appropriately trained staff shall be allowed to administer medications.

The executive director has the power to direct the administration or monitoring of medications to persons receiving services and supports in centers for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities pursuant to section 25-1.5-301 (2)(h), C.R.S.

No person receiving services may be subjected to any experimental research or hazardous treatment procedures without the consent of such person, if the person is over eighteen years of age and is able to give such consent, or of the person's parent, if the person is under eighteen years of age, or of the person's legal guardian. Such consent may be given only after consultation with the interdisciplinary team and an intellectual and developmental disabilities professional not affiliated with the facility or community residential home in which the person receiving services resides. However, no such person of any age may be subjected to experimental research or hazardous treatment procedures if said person implicitly or expressly objects to such procedure.

No person receiving services may have any organs removed for the purpose of transplantation without the consent of such person, if the person is over eighteen years of age and is able to give such consent. If the person's ability to give consent to the medical procedure is challenged by the physician, the same procedures as those set forth in section 25.5-10-232 shall be followed. Consent for the removal of organs for transplantation may be given by the parents of a person receiving services, if the person is under eighteen years of age, or by the person's legal guardian. Such consent may be given only after consultation with the interdisciplinary team and an intellectual and developmental disabilities professional not affiliated with the facility or community residential home in which the person receiving services resides. However, no person receiving services of any age may be a donor of an organ if the person implicitly or expressly objects to such procedure.

As used in subsections (8) and (9) of this section, consent also requires that the person whose consent is sought has been adequately and effectively informed as to the:

Method of experimental research, hazardous treatment, or transplantation;

Nature and consequence of such procedures; and

Risks, benefits, and purposes of such procedures.

The consent of any person may be revoked at any time.

Subsections (8), (9), and (10) of this section do not apply when a physician renders emergency medical care or treatment to any resident.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1771, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-114 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-221. Right to humane treatment.

Corporal punishment of persons with an intellectual and developmental disability is not permitted.

All service agencies shall prohibit mistreatment, exploitation, neglect, or abuse in any form of any person receiving services.

Service agencies shall provide every person receiving services with a humane physical environment.

Each person receiving services must be attended to by qualified staff in numbers sufficient to provide appropriate services and supports.

Seclusion, defined as the placement of a person receiving services alone in a closed room for the purpose of punishment, is prohibited.

"Time out" procedures, defined as separation from other persons receiving services and group activities, may be employed under close and direct professional supervision, as defined by rule by the state board, and only as a technique in behavior-shaping programs. Behavior-shaping programs utilizing a "time out" procedure may be implemented only when it incorporates a positive approach designed to result in the acquisition of adaptive behaviors. Such behavior programs may only be implemented following the completion of a comprehensive functional analysis, when alternative nonrestrictive procedures have been proven to be ineffective, and only with the informed consent of the person, parents, or legal guardian. Such behavior programs may be implemented only following the review and approval process defined in rules. Behavior development programs must be developed in conjunction with the interdisciplinary team and implemented only following review by the human rights committee. Behavior development programs involving the use of the procedure in a "time out room" are prohibited.

Behavior development programs involving the use of aversive or noxious stimuli are prohibited.

Physical restraint, defined as the use of manual methods intended to restrict the movement or normal functioning of a portion of a person's body through direct contact by staff, may be employed only when necessary to protect the person receiving services from injury to self or others. Physical restraint may not be employed as punishment, for the convenience of staff, or as a substitute for a program of services and supports. Physical guidance or prompting techniques of short duration such as those employed in training techniques are not considered physical restraint. Physical restraint may be applied only if alternative techniques have failed and only if such restraint imposed the least possible restriction consistent with its purpose. If physical restraint is used in an emergency or on a continuing basis its use shall be reviewed by the interdisciplinary team and the human rights committee in accordance with the rules of the state board.

The use of a mechanical restraint, defined as the use of mechanical devices intended to restrict the movement or normal functioning of a portion of a person's body, is subject to special review and oversight, as defined in rules. Use of mechanical restraints may be applied only in an emergency if alternative techniques have failed and in conjunction with a behavior development program. Mechanical restraints must be designed and used so as not to cause physical injury to the person receiving services and so as to cause the least possible discomfort. The use of mechanical restraints shall be reviewed by the human rights committee. The use of posey vests, straight jackets, ankle and wrist restraints, and other devices defined in rules is prohibited.

A record must be maintained of all physical injuries to any person receiving services, all incidents of mistreatment, exploitation, neglect, or abuse, and all uses of physical or mechanical restraint. All records are subject to review by the human rights committee.

Behavior development programs must be supervised by an intellectual and developmental disabilities professional having specific knowledge and skills to develop and implement positive behavioral intervention strategies.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1772, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-115 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-222. Right to religious belief, practice, and worship.

No person receiving services is required to perform any act or be subject to any procedure whatsoever which is contrary to the person's religious belief, and each such person has the right to practice such religious belief and be accorded the opportunity for religious worship. Provisions for religious worship must be made available to all persons receiving services on a nondiscriminatory basis. No such person shall be coerced into engaging in or refraining from any religious activity, practice, or belief.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1773, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-116 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-223. Rights to communications and visits.

Each person receiving services has the right to communicate freely and privately with others of the person's own choosing.

Each person receiving services has the right to receive and send sealed, unopened correspondence. No such person's incoming or outgoing correspondence shall be opened, delayed, held, or censored by any person.

Each person receiving services shall have the right to receive and send packages. No such person's outgoing packages shall be opened, delayed, held, or censored by any person.

Each person receiving services must have reasonable access to telephones, both to make and to receive calls in privacy, and must be afforded reasonable and frequent opportunities to meet with visitors.

All service agencies shall ensure that persons receiving services have suitable opportunities for interaction with persons of their choice. Nothing in this section will limit the protections provided under article 3.1 of title 26, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1774, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-117 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-224. Right to fair employment practices.

No person receiving services shall be required to perform labor; except that persons receiving services may voluntarily engage in such labor if the labor is compensated in accordance with applicable minimum wage laws.

No person receiving services shall be involved in the physical care, care and treatment, training, or supervision of other persons receiving services unless such person has volunteered, has been specifically trained in the necessary skills, and has the judgment required for such activities, is adequately supervised, and is reimbursed in accordance with the applicable minimum wage laws.

Each person receiving services may perform vocational training tasks, subject to a presumption that an assignment longer than three months to any task is not a training task, if the specific task or any change in task assignment is an integral part of such person's individualized plan. If such person performs vocational training tasks for which the service agency is receiving compensation from any outside source, the person shall be compensated in accordance with the applicable minimum wage laws.

Each person receiving services may voluntarily engage in labor for which the service agency would otherwise have to pay an employee if the specific labor or any change in labor is an integral part of such person's individualized plan and the person is compensated in accordance with the applicable minimum wage laws.

Each person receiving services may be required to perform tasks of a personal housekeeping nature or tasks oriented to improving community living skills in accordance with the person's individualized plan.

Payment to persons receiving services pursuant to this section shall not be collected by the service agency to offset the costs of providing services and supports to such person.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1774, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-118 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-225. Right to vote.

Each person receiving services who is eligible to vote according to law has the right to vote in all primary and general elections. As necessary, all service agencies shall assist such persons to register to vote, to obtain mail ballots, to comply with other requirements that are prerequisite to voting, and to vote.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1775, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-119 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-226. Records and confidentiality of information pertaining to eligible persons or their families - repeal.

A record for each person receiving services shall be diligently maintained by the community-centered board. The record must include, but not be limited to, information pertaining to the determination of eligibility for services and the individualized plan. The record is not a public record.

Except as otherwise provided by law, all information obtained and any records prepared in the course of determining eligibility or providing services and supports pursuant to this article are confidential and subject to the evidentiary privileges established by law. The disclosure of this information and these records in any manner shall be permitted only:

To the applicant or person receiving services, to the parents of a minor, to such person's legal guardian, and to any person authorized by the above named person;

In communications between qualified professional personnel, including the board of directors of community-centered boards and service agencies providing services to persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, to the extent necessary for the acquisition, provision, oversight, or referral of services and supports;

To the extent necessary to make claims for aid, insurance, or medical assistance to which a person receiving services may be entitled, or to access services and supports pursuant to the individualized plan;

For the purposes of evaluation, gathering statistics, or research when no identifying information concerning an individual person or family is disclosed. Identifying information is information which could reasonably be expected to identify a specific person and includes, but is not limited to, name, address, telephone number, social security number, medicaid number, household number, and photograph.

To the court when necessary to implement the provisions of this article;

To persons authorized by an order of court issued after a hearing, notice of which was given to the person, parents or legal guardian, where appropriate, and the custodian of the information;

To the agency designated pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 6012 as the protection and advocacy system for Colorado when:

A complaint has been received by the protection and advocacy system from or on behalf of a person with an intellectual and developmental disability; and

Such person does not have a legal guardian or the state or the designee of the state is the legal guardian of such person;

To the state department or its designees as deemed necessary by the executive director to fulfill the duties prescribed by this article.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit access by a person receiving services to such person's records.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with the protections afforded to a person under the federal "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1320d, and the federal "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974", 20 U.S.C. sec. 1232g.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1775, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2017:

(4) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1409, § 93, effective May 25.

L. 2021:

(5) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 353, 354, §§ 69, 70.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-120 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-227. Right to personal property.

Each person receiving services has the right to the possession and use of such person's own clothing and personal effects. If the service agency holds any of such person's personal effects for any reason, such retention shall be promptly recorded in such person's record and the reason for retention shall also be recorded.

Upon the request of a person receiving services, a service agency may hold money or funds belonging to the person receiving services, received by such person, or received by the service agency for such person. All such money or funds shall be held by the service agency as trustee for the person receiving services. Upon request, an accounting shall be rendered by the service agency.

Upon request, a person receiving services is entitled to receive reasonable amounts of such person's money or funds held in trust.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1776, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-121 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-228. Right to influence policy.

The persons receiving services of a service agency are entitled to establish a committee to hear the views and represent the interests of all such persons served by the agency and to attempt to influence the policies of the agency to the extent that they influence provision of services and supports.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1776, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-122 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-229. Right to notification.

Each person receiving services has the right to read or have explained, in each person's or family's native language, any rules adopted by the service agency and pertaining to such person's activities.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1777, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-123 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-230. Discrimination.

No person who has received services or supports under any provision of this article shall be discriminated against because of such status. For purposes of this section, "discrimination" means the giving of any unfavorable weight to the fact that a person has received such services or supports.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1777, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-124 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-231. Sterilization rights.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the procedures set forth in the following subsections be utilized when sterilization is being considered for the primary purpose of rendering the person incapable of reproduction.

Any person with an intellectual and developmental disability over eighteen years of age who has given informed consent has the right to be sterilized, subject to the following:

Prior to the procedure, competency to give informed consent and assurance that such consent is voluntarily and freely given shall be evaluated by the following:

A psychiatrist, psychologist, or physician who does not provide services or supports to the person and who has consulted with and interviewed the person with an intellectual and developmental disability; and

An intellectual and developmental disabilities professional who does not provide services or supports in which said person participates, and who has consulted with and interviewed the person with an intellectual and developmental disability.

The professionals who conducted the evaluation pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall consult with the physician who is to perform the operation concerning each professional's opinion in regard to the informed consent of the person requesting the sterilization.

Any person with an intellectual and developmental disability whose capacity to give an informed consent is challenged by the intellectual and developmental disabilities professional or the physician may file a petition with the court to declare competency to give consent pursuant to the procedures set forth in section 25.5-10-232.

No person with an intellectual and developmental disability who is over eighteen years of age and has the capacity to participate in the decision-making process regarding sterilization shall be sterilized in the absence of the person's informed consent. No minor may be sterilized without a court order pursuant to section 25.5-10-233.

Sterilization conducted pursuant to this section shall be legal. Consent given by any person pursuant to subsection (2) of this section is not revocable after sterilization, and no person shall be liable for acting pursuant to such consent.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1777, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-128 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-232. Competency to give consent to sterilization.

If the competency of the person with an intellectual and developmental disability to give consent to sterilization is disputed by the intellectual and developmental disabilities professional, the psychiatrist or psychologist, or physician, said person may file a petition for declaration of competency to give consent to sterilization with the court. Upon the filing of a petition which shows that said person is over eighteen years of age and desires to give consent to sterilization, the court shall immediately set a hearing to determine the person's competency to give such consent. For the purpose of determining competency, the court shall appoint two or more independent professional persons with expertise in the field of intellectual and developmental disabilities who do not provide services and supports to said person to examine said person and to present their findings as to said person's competency to give consent to sterilization at the competency hearing.

If the court determines that the person has given consent to sterilization and is competent to give such consent, the court may order that the sterilization be performed unless the person withdraws consent to sterilization prior to the sterilization being performed. If the court determines that the person is incompetent to give consent to sterilization, the court shall order that no sterilization be performed without further court proceedings pursuant to section 25.5-10-233.

Determination of competency in these proceedings is specific to the ability to give consent to sterilization and does not determine legal competency for any other purpose.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1778, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-129 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-233. Court-ordered sterilization.

A person with an intellectual and developmental disability who has been determined to be incompetent to give consent, the person's legal guardian, or the parents of a minor with an intellectual and developmental disability, may petition the court to hold a hearing to determine whether said person should be ordered to be sterilized. The petition shall set forth the following:

The name, age, and residence of the person to be sterilized;

The name, address, and relation to said person of the petitioner;

The names and addresses of any parents, spouse, legal guardian, or custodian of said person;

The mental condition of the person to be sterilized;

A statement that the sterilization is medically necessary to preserve the life or physical or mental health of the person, including a short and plain description of the reasons behind the determination of medical necessity;

A statement that other less intrusive measures were considered and the reasons behind the determination that less intrusive means would not protect the interests of the person.

Upon petition to the court, the court shall appoint an attorney who will represent the interests of the person with an intellectual and developmental disability and one or more experts in the intellectual and developmental disability field to examine the person and to give testimony at the hearing regarding the person's mental and physical status and other relevant matters.

The hearing on the petition must be held promptly. The person with an intellectual and developmental disability must be represented by an attorney and must have the opportunity to present testimony and to cross-examine witnesses.

Copies of the petition and notices of the time and place of the hearing shall be mailed, not less than ten days prior to the hearing, to the person with an intellectual and developmental disability, that person's attorney, a parent or next of kin, and legal guardian or custodian.

Reasonable fees and costs incurred pursuant to this section shall be paid by the court for a person who is indigent.

Prior to ordering sterilization, the court must find:

That the person lacks the capacity to effectively participate in the decision-making process regarding sterilization or is a minor with an intellectual and developmental disability;

That the court has heard from the person regarding that person's desires, if possible, and the court has considered the desires of the person;

That the person lacks the capacity to make a decision regarding sterilization and that the person's capacity to make such a decision is unlikely to improve in the future;

That the person is capable of reproduction and is likely to engage in activities at the present or in the near future which could result in pregnancy;

By clear and convincing evidence, that the sterilization is medically necessary to preserve the life or physical or mental health of the person, including a short and plain description of the reasons behind the determination of medical necessity;

That other less intrusive measures were considered and the reasons behind the determination that less intrusive means would not protect the interests of the person.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1778, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-130 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-234. Confidentiality of sterilization proceedings.

All records, hearings, and proceedings pursuant to sections 25.5-10-231 to 25.5-10-233 are strictly confidential unless requested to be open to the public by the person with an intellectual and developmental disability or the person's legal guardian.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1779, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-131 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-235. Limitations on sterilization.

Consent to sterilization shall be made neither a condition for release from any institution nor a condition for the exercise of any right, privilege, or freedom.

Nothing in this article requires any hospital or any person to participate in any sterilization, nor shall any hospital or any person be civilly or criminally liable for refusing to participate in any sterilization.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1779, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-132 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-236. Civil action and attorney fees.

A violation of any provision of this article gives rise to a civil cause of action by the person adversely affected by such violation, and any judgment may include plaintiff's reasonable attorney fees.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1780, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-134 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-237. Terminology.

Whenever the terms "insane", "insanity", "mentally or mental incompetent", "mental incompetency", or "of unsound mind" are used in the laws of the state of Colorado, they shall be deemed to refer to the insane, as defined in section 16-8-101, C.R.S., or to a person with an intellectual and developmental disability, as defined in section 25.5-10-202, as the context of the particular law requires.

Whenever the term "mentally deficient person" is used in the laws of the state of Colorado, it shall be deemed to mean and be included with the term "person with an intellectual and developmental disability", as defined in section 25.5-10-202.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1780, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-135 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-238. Federal funds.

The state department is authorized to accept, on behalf of the state, any grants of federal funds made available for any purposes consistent with the provisions of this article. The executive director of the state department, with the approval of the governor, shall have power to direct the disposition of any such grants so accepted in conformity with the terms and conditions under which they are given.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1780, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-137 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-239. Evaluations to determine whether a defendant is mentally retarded or has an intellectual and developmental disability for purposes of class 1 felony trials.

Upon request of the court, the executive director, or his or her designee, shall recommend specific professionals who are qualified to perform an evaluation to determine whether a defendant is mentally retarded or is a defendant with an intellectual and developmental disability, as defined in section 18-1.3-1101. A recommended professional must be licensed as a psychologist in the state of Colorado and must have experience in and demonstrated competence in determination and evaluation of persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities. The executive director shall convene a panel of not fewer than three persons with expertise in intellectual and developmental disabilities to assess the qualifications of licensed psychologists and make recommendations to the executive director or his or her designee.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1780, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-096), ch. 44, p. 474, § 17, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-139 as it existed prior to 2013.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-096, see section 1 of chapter 44, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

25.5-10-240. Retaliation prohibited.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective until July 1, 2024.

]

No person shall be discriminated against because he or she has made a complaint, testified, assisted, or participated in any manner in an investigation, proceeding, or hearing pursuant to this article, including the dispute resolution procedures in section 25.5-10-212 and section 27-10.5-107, C.R.S. A service agency, including the state department and any community-centered board, shall not coerce, intimidate, threaten, or interfere with any person in the exercise or enjoyment of any right pursuant to this article, or on account of his or her having exercised or enjoyed any right pursuant to this article, or on account of his or her having aided or encouraged any other person in the exercise or enjoyment of any right pursuant to this article.

25.5-10-240. Retaliation prohibited.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective July 1, 2024.

]

No person shall be discriminated against because the person has made a complaint, testified, assisted, or participated in any manner in an investigation, proceeding, or hearing pursuant to this article 10, including the dispute resolution procedures in section 25.5-10-212 and section 27-10.5-107. A service agency, including the state department and any case management agency, shall not coerce, intimidate, threaten, or interfere with any person in the exercise or enjoyment of any right pursuant to this article 10, or on account of the person having exercised or enjoyed any right pursuant to this article 10, or on account of the person having aided or encouraged any other person in the exercise or enjoyment of any right pursuant to this article 10.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1780, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 343, § 46, effective July 1, 2024.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-141 as it existed prior to 2013.